Utah statutes.
13-32a-114.   Preemption of local ordinances -- Exceptions.
(1)  This chapter preempts all city, county, and other local ordinances
governing pawn or secondhand businesses and pawnbroking transactions, if the
ordinances are more restrictive than the provisions of this chapter or are not
consistent with this chapter.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not preclude a city, county, or other local
governmental unit from:
(a)  enacting or enforcing local ordinances concerning public health, safety,
or welfare, if the ordinances are uniform and equal in application to pawn and
secondhand businesses and other retail businesses or activities;
(b)  requiring a pawn or secondhand business to obtain and maintain a business
license; and
(c)  enacting zoning ordinances that restrict areas where pawn or secondhand
businesses and other retail businesses or activities can be located.
